New Jersey, session 221, A1951.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2022, c.49, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 66 DEPARTMENT OF LAW AND PUBLIC SAFETY 80 Special Government Services 82 Protection of Citizens Rights GRANTS-IN-AID 19-1440 Victims of Crime Compensation Office ............................. $750,000 Total Grants-In-Aid Appropriation, $750,000 Victims of Crime Compensation Office........................... Grants-In-Aid: 19   Public Awareness Campaign: Crime Victims Bill of Rights and VCCO Assistance . ($750,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.